Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-526
County engineer; election; when required; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

Except as provided in section 22-417, a county engineer shall be elected in each county having a population of one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants or more at the statewide general election in 1990 and each four years thereafter. The term of the county engineer shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The county engineer shall meet the qualifications found in section 23-1901. The county engineer shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 122;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 49.